Massachusetts, session 194th, H5448.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 15 of the City of Holyoke Charter shall be amended by deleting the
paragraph following the heading in total and replacing it with the following:
(a) Said city council shall annually in the month of January elect by ballot an
administrative assistant to the city council, who shall hold their office for the term of two years
beginning with the first Monday in February in the year of their election and until their successor
is elected and qualified, unless sooner removed.
(b) Said city council shall also in the month of January, and in the month of January
in every third year thereafter, appoint a Director of Internal Audit, who shall hold their office for
the term of three years beginning with the first Monday in February in the year of their election
and until their successor is elected and qualified, unless sooner removed.
of 2

(c) Said city council shall also annually in the month of January elect by ballot one
assessor of taxes and one water commissioner, each of whom shall hold their office for the term
of three years beginning with the first Monday in February in the year of their election and until
their successor is elected and qualified unless sooner removed.
(d) Any of said officers may be removed at any time by the city council for sufficient
cause. The present assessors of taxes and the water commissioners shall continue to hold their
respective offices, unless sooner removed, for the term of three years from the first Monday in
February in the year following their election. Vacancies in city offices, where no other provision
is made for filling the same, shall be filled by the election or appointment of a successor in the
same manner as the previous incumbent was elected or appointed, and the person elected or
appointed to fill the vacancy shall hold their office for the remainder of the term during which
their predecessor would have been entitled to hold the same.
SECTION 2: So much of Chapter 438 of the Acts of 1896 and Chapter 327 of the Acts of
1936 and acts in amendment thereof and addition thereto, as is inconsistent with this act, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 3: The General Court may make clerical or editorial changes of form only to
the bill, unless the Mayor and City Council approve amendments before enactment by the
General Court. The Mayor and City Council are hereby authorized to approve amendments
which shall be within the scope of the general public objectives of this petition.
SECTION 4: This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.
of 2